Maryland, session 2025, HB1539.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
12–301.
(a) (1) On application, the Administration shall issue an identification card to
any applicant who:
[(1)] (I) Is a resident of this State;
[(2)] (II) Does not have a driver’s license;
[(3)] (III) Presents a birth certificate or other proof of age and identity
acceptable to the Administration;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1539*

HOUSE BILL 1539
[(4)] (IV) Provides satisfactory documentary evidence that the applicant
has lawful status;
[(5) (i)] (V) 1. Provides satisfactory documentary evidence that
the applicant has a valid Social Security number by presenting the applicant’s Social
Security Administration account card or, if the Social Security Administration account card
is not available, any of the following documents bearing the applicant’s Social Security
number:
[1.] A. A current W–2 form;
[2.] B. A current SSA–1099 form;
[3.] C. A current non–SSA–1099 form; or
[4.] D. A current pay stub with the applicant’s name and
Social Security number on it; or
[(ii)] 2. Provides satisfactory documentary evidence that the
applicant is not eligible for a Social Security number; and
[(6)] (VI) Presents a completed application for an identification card on a
form furnished by the Administration.
(2) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY NOT REQUIRE A PARENT OR LEGAL
GUARDIAN OF A MINOR 15 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER TO COSIGN OR BE PRESENT AT
THE TIME OF SUBMISSION OF THE MINOR’S APPLICATION FOR AN IDENTIFICATION
CARD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.